Alaska, session 34, SB245.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 44.12 is amended by adding a new section to article 2 to read: 05 Sec. 44.12.197. Alaska Arts and Culture Day. Alaska Arts and Culture Day 06 is established on June 21 of each year. Alaska Arts and Culture Day may be observed 07 by schools, community groups, and other public and private agencies and individuals 08 with celebratory events, projects, and activities directed at or involving people of all 09 ages to increase awareness and appreciation of arts and culture in the state. 10 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.